Utah statutes.
72-1-102.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Commission" means the Transportation Commission created under Section 72-1-301.

(2)  "Construction" means the construction, reconstruction, replacement, and improvement of the highways, including the acquisition of rights-of-way and material sites.

(3)  "Department" means the Department of Transportation created in Section 72-1-201.

(4)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the department appointed under Section 72-1-202.

(5)  "Farm tractor" has the meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(6)  "Federal aid primary highway" means that portion of connected main highways located within this state officially designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation under Title 23, Highways, U.S.C.

(7)  "Highway" means any public road, street, alley, lane, court, place, viaduct, tunnel, culvert, bridge, or structure laid out or erected for public use, or dedicated or abandoned to the public, or made  public in an action for the partition of real property, including the entire area within the right-of-way.

(8)  "Highway authority" means the department or the legislative, executive, or governing body of a county or municipality.

(9)  "Implement of husbandry" has the meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(10)  "Interstate system" means any highway officially designated by the department and included as part of the national interstate and defense highways, as provided in the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1956 and any supplemental acts or amendments.

(11)  "Limited-access facility" means a highway especially designated for through traffic, and over, from, or to which neither owners nor occupants of abutting lands nor other persons have any right or easement, or have only a limited right or easement of access, light, air, or view.

(12)  "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(13)  "Municipality" has the same meaning set forth in Section 10-1-104.

(14)  "National highway systems highways" means that portion of connected main highways located within this state officially designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation under Title 23, Highways, U.S.C.

(15) (a)  "Port-of-entry" means a fixed or temporary facility constructed, operated, and maintained by the department where drivers, vehicles, and vehicle loads are checked or inspected for compliance with state and federal laws as specified in Section 72-9-501.

(b)  "Port-of-entry" includes inspection and checking stations and weigh stations.

(16)  "Port-of-entry agent" means a person employed at a port-of-entry to perform the duties specified in Section 72-9-501.

(17)  "Right-of-way" means real property or an interest in real property, usually in a strip, acquired for or devoted to a highway.

(18) "Sealed" does not preclude acceptance of electronically sealed and submitted bids or proposals in addition to bids or proposals manually sealed and submitted.

(19)  "Semitrailer" has the meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(20)  "SR" means state route and has the same meaning as state highway as defined in this section.

(21)  "State highway" means those highways designated as state highways in Title 72, Chapter 4, Designation of State Highways Act.

(22)  "State highway purposes" has the meaning set forth in Section 72-5-102.

(23)  "State transportation systems" means all streets, alleys, roads, highways, and thoroughfares of any kind, including connected structures, airports, spaceports, and all other modes and forms of conveyance used by the public.

(24)  "Trailer" has the meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(25)  "Truck tractor" has the meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

(26)  "UDOT" means the Utah Department of Transportation.

(27)  "Vehicle" has the same meaning set forth in Section 41-1a-102.

